Hawaii statutes.
§379-3 Advertising. (a) If any person
advertises for, or seeks employees by means of newspapers, posters, letters,
radio, television, or by means of any employment agency to work for that person
or the person for whom that person is acting at any shop, plant, or
establishment, while a labor dispute is still in active progress at the shop,
plant, or establishment, that person shall plainly and explicitly mention in
the advertisement or solicitation that a labor dispute exists.

(b) The person soliciting or advertising for
employees in the manner set forth in this section shall use in the
advertisement or solicitation that person's own name, and, if that person is
representing another, the name of the person that person is representing and at
whose direction and under whose authority the solicitation or advertisement is
made. The appearance of this name in connection with the advertisement or
solicitation shall be deemed prima facie evidence as to the person responsible
for the advertisement or solicitation. [L 1967, c 18, pt of §2; HRS §379-3; am
L 2016, c 55, §6]

Case Notes

Section not preempted by federal law; among other things,
requiring truthful advertising does not affect employer's ability to find
replacements. 82 F. Supp. 2d 1151 (2000), amended, 103 F. Supp. 2d 1233 (2000).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next